Maine, session 132, LD741.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §9722, sub-§6, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 391, §4, is further
amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) International Energy Conservation Code published by the International Code
Council, including Appendix CB of the 2021 edition of the code for the
construction of new commercial buildings as defined by the board;
Sec. 2. Rule exceptions. In adopting rules to define "new commercial buildings" in
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 10, section 9722, subsection 6, paragraph B,
subparagraph (4), the Technical Building Codes and Standards Board shall exclude
commercial buildings that have received all necessary permits and approvals before July 1,
2026 and any buildings that receive funding from the Maine State Housing Authority.